Utah statutes.
64-13-27.   Records -- Access.

(1) (a)  The Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103, county attorneys' offices, and state and local law enforcement agencies shall furnish to the department upon request a copy of records of any person arrested in this state.

(b)  The department shall maintain centralized files on all offenders under the jurisdiction of the department and make the files available for review by other criminal justice agencies upon request in cases where offenders are the subject of active investigations.

(2)  All records maintained by programs under contract to the department providing services to public offenders are the property of the department.



Amended by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

